Georgia statutes. TITLE 52 Waters of the State, Ports, and Watercraft
CHAPTER 3 Intracoastal Waterway

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1017, § 1, effective April 9, 1981, provides for the transfer of the functions of the Georgia Intracoastal Waterway Commission to the Department of Transportation.

52-3-1.
Purpose of chapter.

It is the intent and purpose of this chapter to provide for the construction and maintenance by the United States government of the intracoastal waterway and its salt-water tributaries, hereinafter referred to as the intracoastal waterway, from the state boundary line in the Savannah River to the state boundary line in Cumberland Sound, as authorized by the Congress of the United States by the River and Harbor Act approved June 20, 1938, authorizing the construction of the intracoastal waterway to a depth of 12 feet from the Savannah River, Georgia, to Cumberland Sound, Georgia, in accordance with the project described in House Document No. 618, Seventy-fifth Congress, third session, and subject to the conditions set forth in said document, and by the River and Harbor Act approved August 26, 1937, authorizing the construction of a protected route as part of the intracoastal waterway, around St. Andrew Sound, Georgia, to a depth of seven feet in accordance with the project described in Senate Committee Print, Seventy-fourth Congress, first session, and subject to the conditions set forth in that document. The Governor and the Secretary of State are authorized to issue to the United States of America a grant or grants of a perpetual right and easement to enter upon, cut away, and remove any and all of the land, including submerged lands, composing a part of the channel rights of way, anchorage areas, and turning basins as may be required at any time for construction and maintenance of the intracoastal waterway and to maintain the portions excavated, thereby created as a part of the navigable waters of the United States. The Governor and the Secretary of State are authorized to issue to the United States of America a further perpetual right and easement to enter upon, occupy, and use any portion of the land, including submerged land, composing a part of the spoil disposal area not so cut away and converted into public navigable waters described in this Code section, for the deposit of dredged material and for such other purposes as may be needed in the construction, maintenance, and improvement of the intracoastal waterway, insofar as such lands, including submerged lands, are subject to grant by the State of Georgia. The grant is to be issued upon a certificate showing the location and description of the rights of way and spoil disposal areas furnished to the Governor by the secretary of the army or by any authorized officer of the Corps of Engineers of the United States Army or by any other authorized official exercising control over the construction or maintenance of the projects.

History.

Ga. L. 1939, p. 331, § 1.

52-3-2 and 52-3-3.
[Reserved]

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1017, § 2, effective April 9, 1981.

Editor’s notes.

These Code sections were based on Ga. L. 1939, p. 331, § 2.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 53/HB 142, reserved the designation of these Code sections, effective May 13, 2011.

52-3-4.
Cooperation with federal government; acquisition of property and rights.

The Department of Transportation shall work in cooperation with the officers and departments of the United States government in acquiring rights of way, spoil disposal areas, and other necessary property and rights for the intracoastal waterway and may in its own name acquire, by purchase, gift, or condemnation, property and rights to such lands as are necessary for such purpose.

History.

Ga. L. 1939, p. 331, § 2; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1017, § 1.

52-3-5.
Exercise of power of eminent domain.

If for any reason the Department of Transportation is unable to secure any such property or rights required by the United States government for the construction and maintenance of the intracoastal waterway from the Savannah River to Cumberland Sound by voluntary agreement with the owner or owners thereof on terms and conditions satisfactory to it, the department is vested with the power to condemn the same and in so doing to employ the way, means, method, and procedure of Chapter 2 of Title 22 and Article 6 of Chapter 3 of Title 22, relating to the acquisition of property by condemnation on the part of the State of Georgia and of the United States; and in all instances any general and specific benefits to the owner or owners of such property or lands shall be offset against any damages to such property or lands. When the easement or property is thus acquired, a deed shall be executed conveying it to the United States. All easements granted under the authority of this Code section shall be approved by the State Transportation Board and shall be executed by the commissioner of transportation.

History.

Ga. L. 1939, p. 331, § 2; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1017, § 1.

52-3-6.
[Reserved] Seal; election of officers.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1017, § 2, effective April 9, 1981.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1939, p. 331, § 2.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 53/HB 142, reserved the designation of this Code section, effective May 13, 2011.

52-3-7.
Right of Department of Transportation to receive and use gifts and donations of money and property.

The Department of Transportation may receive gifts and donations of money or property from individuals, firms, corporations, and political subdivisions and may use the same in defraying expenses of the department and the costs of acquiring the property and rights necessary for the construction, maintenance, and improvement of the intracoastal waterway.

History.

Ga. L. 1939, p. 331, § 3; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1017, § 1.

52-3-8.
Procedure in cases where property required for right of way or spoil disposal areas has been leased for cultivation and gathering of oysters.

If any of the lands or property, the use of which is required for right of way and spoil disposal areas, shall have been leased by the Department of Natural Resources to any individual, firm, or corporation for the cultivation and gathering of oysters, the department is authorized and directed to substitute for such leased areas lying within the rights of way and spoil disposal areas other equal areas lying outside the rights of way and spoil disposal areas which are also suitable for the cultivation and gathering of oysters.

History.

Ga. L. 1939, p. 331, § 4.

Cross references.

Lease of oyster and clam beds by Department of Natural Resources generally, §

27-4-198

.

52-3-9.
Claims for damages to oysters.

Any person, firm, or corporation or their heirs, executors, administrators, successors, or assigns who may be compensated for damages to oysters during construction of the intracoastal waterway shall be estopped from making further claims for damage to oysters in or upon the same area on account of dredging operations during maintenance of the intracoastal waterway.

History.

Ga. L. 1939, p. 331, § 5.

52-3-10.
[Reserved] Power of Governor to assign assistant attorney general to assist commission.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1017, § 2, effective April 9, 1981.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1939, p. 331, § 6.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 53/HB 142, reserved the designation of this Code section, effective May 13, 2011.

52-3-11.
Right of Department of Transportation to enter lands in order to locate rights of way.

For the purpose of determining the lands, easements, and property necessary for the uses set out in this chapter, the Department of Transportation, the United States government, or the agents of either shall have the right to enter upon any lands along the general line of the rights of way for the purpose of locating definitely the specific lines of the rights of way and the land required for such purposes; and there shall be no claim against the State of Georgia or the United States for such acts as may be done in making such surveys.

History.

Ga. L. 1939, p. 331, § 7; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1017, § 1.

52-3-12.
Effect of chapter on state’s jurisdiction over lands affected by chapter; effect on service of process on such lands.

Neither this chapter, nor any part thereof, nor any grant or deed made under the authority hereof shall operate to divest the State of Georgia of jurisdiction over any lands; and all civil and criminal process issued under the authority of any laws of this state may be executed in or on any part of the lands or premises devoted to the use of the intracoastal waterway or to any use incidental thereto, to the same effect as if this chapter had not been enacted and as if the grant or deed had not been executed.

History.

Ga. L. 1939, p. 331, § 8.